Illinois, session 104th, SB2862.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Sections 18-167 and 20-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-167 new)7    Sec. 18-167. Retail improvement abatement area. 8    (a) On and after January 1, 2027, a municipality may, by 9ordinance, designate an area within its jurisdiction as a 10retail improvement abatement area if the area (i) is a 11contiguous area, (ii) consists of at least one-half square 12mile and  not more than 12 square miles, exclusive of lakes and 13waterways, and (iii) has a vacancy rate for retail properties 14that exceeds 40% at the time the ordinance is adopted.15    (b) After the designation of a retail improvement 16abatement area under this Section, the owner of property that 17is located in the retail improvement abatement area and that 18is used primarily for retail purposes may enter into one or 19more agreements with any of the taxing districts in which the 20property is located to abate all or a portion of the taxes 21levied by the taxing district on the subject property. An 22agreement entered into under this subsection (b) shall require 23the property owner to make a special payment to the taxing   SB2862- 2 -LRB104 16653 HLH 30057 b1district in lieu of the property taxes that would otherwise be 2imposed on the property. The special payment shall be 3calculated as a percentage of the retail sales that occur at 4the property during the taxable year. If the retail business 5is a tenant, then the owners of the retail business may enter 6into an agreement under this Section if the owners of the 7retail business enter into a triple net lease with the 8property owner pursuant to which the owners of the retail 9business are liable for the payment of property taxes under 10this Code. 11    (c) Special payments required under this Section shall be 12collected and are subject to the same enforcement procedures 13as provided in Article 21 of this Code with respect to the 14payment of property taxes under this Code.  15    (35 ILCS 200/20-15)16    Sec. 20-15. Information on bill or separate statement. 17There shall be printed on each bill, or on a separate slip 18which shall be mailed with the bill:19        (a) a statement itemizing the rate at which taxes have 20    been extended for each of the taxing districts in the 21    county in whose district the property is located, and in 22    those counties utilizing electronic data processing 23    equipment the dollar amount of tax due from the person 24    assessed allocable to each of those taxing districts, 25    including a separate statement of the dollar amount of tax   SB2862- 3 -LRB104 16653 HLH 30057 b1    due which is allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois 2    Local Library Act or to any other tax levied by a 3    municipality or township for public library purposes,4        (b) a separate statement for each of the taxing 5    districts of the dollar amount of tax due which is 6    allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois Pension Code 7    or to any other tax levied by a municipality or township 8    for public pension or retirement purposes,9        (b-5) a list of each tax increment financing (TIF) 10    district in which the property is located, the dollar 11    amount of tax due that is allocable to the TIF district, 12    and each redevelopment project that (i) is associated with 13    the TIF district and (ii) has been completed during or 14    before the taxable year for which the bill is prepared or 15    is in the process of being completed during that taxable 16    year, 17        (c) the total tax rate,18        (d) the total amount of tax due, and19        (e) the amount by which the total tax and the tax 20    allocable to each taxing district differs from the 21    taxpayer's last prior tax bill, and .22        (f) the amount of any special payment required under 23    Section with respect to the property under Section 18-167. 24    The county treasurer shall ensure that only those taxing 25districts in which a parcel of property is located shall be 26listed on the bill for that property.  SB2862- 4 -LRB104 16653 HLH 30057 b1    In all counties the statement shall also provide:2        (1) the property index number or other suitable 3    description,4        (2) the assessment of the property,5        (3) the statutory amount of each homestead exemption 6    applied to the property, 7        (4) the assessed value of the property after 8    application of all homestead exemptions, 9        (5) the equalization factors imposed by the county and 10    by the Department, and11        (6) the equalized assessment resulting from the 12    application of the equalization factors to the basic 13    assessment.14    In all counties which do not classify property for 15purposes of taxation, for property on which a single family 16residence is situated the statement shall also include a 17statement to reflect the fair cash value determined for the 18property. In all counties which classify property for purposes 19of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article IX of the 20Illinois Constitution, for parcels of residential property in 21the lowest assessment classification the statement shall also 22include a statement to reflect the fair cash value determined 23for the property.24    In all counties, the statement must include information 25that certain taxpayers may be eligible for tax exemptions, 26abatements, and other assistance programs and that, for more   SB2862- 5 -LRB104 16653 HLH 30057 b1information, taxpayers should consult with the office of their 2township or county assessor and with the Department of 3Revenue. For bills mailed on or after January 1, 2026, the 4statement must include, in bold face type, a list of 5exemptions available to taxpayers and contact information for 6the chief county assessment officer. 7    In counties which use the estimated or accelerated billing 8methods, these statements shall only be provided with the 9final installment of taxes due. The provisions of this Section 10create a mandatory statutory duty. They are not merely 11directory or discretionary. The failure or neglect of the 12collector to mail the bill, or the failure of the taxpayer to 13receive the bill, shall not affect the validity of any tax, or 14the liability for the payment of any tax.15(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)